Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-901
Zoning regulations; power to adopt; when; comprehensive development plan; planning commission; reports and hearings; purpose; validity of plan; not applicable; when.

(1) For the purpose of promoting health, safety, morals, or the general welfare of the community, the legislative bodies in cities of the first and second class and in villages may adopt zoning regulations which regulate and restrict the height, number of stories, and size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of lot that may be occupied, the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces, the density of population, and the location and use of buildings, structures, and land for trade, industry, residence, or other purposes.

(2) Such powers shall be exercised only after the municipal legislative body has established a planning commission, received from its planning commission a recommended comprehensive development plan as defined in section 19-903, adopted such comprehensive development plan, and received the specific recommendation of the planning commission on the adoption or amendment of zoning regulations. The planning commission shall make a preliminary report and hold public hearings on its recommendations regarding the adoption or repeal of the comprehensive development plan and zoning regulations and shall hold public hearings thereon before submitting its final report to the legislative body. Amendments to the comprehensive plan or zoning regulations shall be considered at public hearings before submitting recommendations to the legislative body.

(3) A comprehensive development plan as defined in section 19-903 which has been adopted and not rescinded by such legislative body prior to May 17, 1967, shall be deemed to have been recommended and adopted in compliance with the procedural requirements of this section when, prior to the adoption of the plan by the legislative body, a recommendation thereon had been made to the legislative body by a zoning commission in compliance with the provisions of section 19-906, or by a planning commission appointed under the provisions of Chapter 19, article 9, regardless of whether the planning commission had been appointed as a zoning commission.

(4) The requirement that a planning commission be appointed and a comprehensive development plan be adopted shall not apply to cities of the first and second class and villages which have legally adopted a zoning ordinance prior to May 17, 1967, and which have not amended the zoning ordinance or zoning map since May 17, 1967. Such city or village shall appoint a planning commission and adopt the comprehensive plan prior to amending the zoning ordinance or zoning map.

Laws 1927, c. 43, § 1, p. 182;

C.S.1929, § 19-901;

Laws 1941, c. 131, § 8, p. 509;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 19-901;

R.S.1943, § 19-901;

Laws 1959, c. 65, § 1, p. 289;

Laws 1967, c. 92, § 1, p. 283;

Laws 1967, c. 93, § 1, p. 288;

Laws 1974, LB 508, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 10;

Laws 1977, LB 95, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 71, § 8.

When a legislative body does not specify the manner in which a comprehensive development plan is to be adopted, it is assumed that such plan may be effectively adopted via resolution. Smith v. City of Papillion, 270 Neb. 607, 705 N.W.2d 584 (2005).

Zoning powers granted to villages under section 19-901, R.R.S.1943, shall be exercised only after the municipal legislative body has appointed a planning commission, received from its planning commission a recommended comprehensive development plan as defined in section 19-903, R.R.S.1943, adopted such comprehensive development plan, and received the specific recommendation of the planning commission on the adoption or amendment of zoning regulations. Village of McGrew v. Steidley, 208 Neb. 726, 305 N.W.2d 627 (1981).

Plaintiff was not entitled to an injunction enjoining defendant from erecting a fire station in violation of a zoning ordinance. Witzel v. Village of Brainard, 208 Neb. 231, 302 N.W.2d 723 (1981).

Adoption, amendment, supplement, or change of regulations and restrictions under comprehensive development plan shall not become effective until after a public hearing of which notice has been given. Stec v. Countryside of Hastings, Inc., 190 Neb. 733, 212 N.W.2d 561 (1973).

Cities of the first class have authority to regulate and restrict the use of land located within boundaries of the city. City of Grand Island v. Ehlers, 180 Neb. 331, 142 N.W.2d 770 (1966).

This section was not applicable to zoning act relating to first class cities only. Schlientz v. City of North Platte, 172 Neb. 477, 110 N.W.2d 58 (1961).

Action of city council in zoning or rezoning must have a foundation in promoting health, safety, morals, or general welfare of the community. Weber v. City of Grand Island, 165 Neb. 827, 87 N.W.2d 575 (1958).